src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
sullasašlágan:sullasaš# LAGAN ;
fuođđolágan:fuođđo# LAGAN ;
fuođđolágaš:fuođđo# LAGAS ;
guđelágan:guđe# LAGAN ;
bággolonistanlágan:bággo#lonistan# LAGAN ;
bággolonistanlágaš:bággo#lonistan# LAGAS ;
vearrolágan:vearro# LAGAN ;
fanaslágaš:fanas# LAGAS ;
goabbatlágan+Err/Sub:goabbát# LAGAN ;
šlahttelágaš:šlahtte# LAGAS ;
iežanlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežan# LAGAN ;
iehčametlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčamet# LAGAN ;
iežatlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežat# LAGAS ;
iežasetlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaset# LAGAS ;
mierkkálágan:mierkká# LAGAN ;
sudnolágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sudno# LAGAN ;
mulágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mu# LAGAS ;
dudnolágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dudno# LAGAS ;
hárdinlágan:hárdin# LAGAN ;
dakkárgelágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dakkárge# LAGAN ;
dákkárlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dákkár# LAGAS ;
duokkárgelágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duokkárge# LAGAS ;
dalálágan:dalá# LAGAN ;
dálálágaš:dálá# LAGAS ;
dallošlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dalloš# LAGAN ;
visseslágan:visses# LAGAN ;
duoidlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duoid9# LAGAN ;
institušuvdnalágan:institušuvdna# LAGAN ;
goabbatgelágan:goabbatge# LAGAN ;
golmmalágan:golmma# LAGAN ;
vearjolágan:vearjo# LAGAN ;
roggelágan:rogge# LAGAN ;
speadjárlágan:speadjár# LAGAN ;
gámavuođulágan:gáma#vuođu# LAGAN ;
moarselágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moarse# LAGAN ;
mášenlágan:mášen# LAGAN ;
eŋgellágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eŋgel# LAGAS ;
visseslágaš:visses# LAGAS ;
duoidlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duoid9# LAGAS ;
institušuvdnalágaš:institušuvdna# LAGAS ;
goabbatgelágaš:goabbatge# LAGAS ;
golmmalágaš:golmma# LAGAS ;
vearjolágaš:vearjo# LAGAS ;
roggelágaš:rogge# LAGAS ;
speadjárlágaš:speadjár# LAGAS ;
gámavuođulágaš:gáma#vuođu# LAGAS ;
moarselágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moarse# LAGAS ;
mášenlágaš:mášen# LAGAS ;
máŋggalágaš:máŋgga# LAGAS ;
návetlágaš:návet# LAGAS ;
allalágan:alla# LAGAN ;
beatnatlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:beatnat9# LAGAS; !
boaššumus+A+Superl:boaššumuss BUOREMUSS ;
buotlágan:buot9# LAGAN ;
davimuš+A+Superl:davimušš BUOREMUSS ;
dánlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dán# LAGAN ;
fávllimus+A+Superl:fávllimuss BUOREMUSS ;
fávllimuš+A+Superl:fávllimužž BUOREMUSS ;
gallilágan:galli# LAGAN ;
gaskkamus+A+Superl:gaskkamuss BUOREMUS ;
gaskkamuš+A+Superl:gaskkamušš BUOREMUSS ;
gaskkamuš+A+Superl:gaskkamužž BUOREMUSS ;
gávpotlágaš:gávpot# LAGAS ;
heajoslágan:heajos# LAGAN ;
iešguđetlágan+Err/Sub:ieš#gudet9# LAGAN ;
lahka+A+Superl:lagamuss BUOREMUSS ;
lahka+A+Superl:lagamušš BUOREMUSS ;
lahka+A+Superl:lagamužž BUOREMUSS ;
loaiddumuš+A+Superl:loaiddumužž BUOREMUSS ;
lulimuš+A+Superl:lulimužž BUOREMUSS ;
bartalágan:barta# LAGAN ;
maŋit+A+Superl+Err/Sub:manjimuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋimuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋimužž BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl+Err/Sub:máŋimužž BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋemuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋemužž BUOREMUSS ;
mearamuš+A+Superl:mearamužž BUOREMUSS ;
máttimuš+A+Superl:máttimužž BUOREMUSS ;
máŋggalágan:máŋgga# LAGAN ;
nuorttamus+A+Superl:nuorttamuss BUOREMUSS ;
nuorttamuš+A+Superl:nuorttamužž BUOREMUSS ;
nuorttimus+A+Superl:nuorttimuss BUOREMUSS ;
oarjjimuš+A+Superl:oarjjimužž BUOREMUSS ;
olggumuš+A+Superl:olggumužž BUOREMUSS ;
ovddemus+A+Superl:ovddemuss BUOREMUSS ;
ovddemuš+A+Superl:ovddemužž BUOREMUSS ;
ovddimus+A+Superl:ovddimuss BUOREMUSS ;
ovddimuš+A+Superl:ovddimužž BUOREMUSS ;
ođđalágan:ođđa# LAGAN ;
ravddamus+A+Superl:ravddamuss BUOREMUSS ;
ravddamuš+A+Superl:ravddamužž BUOREMUSS ;
rittumuš+A+Superl:rittumužž BUOREMUSS ;
siskkimus+A+Superl:siskkimuss BUOREMUSS ;
smávislágan:smávis# LAGAN ;
smávislágaš:smávis# LAGAS ;
čázelágan:čáze# LAGAN ;
uskkimuš+A+Superl:uskkimužž BUOREMUSS ;
vearámus+A+Superl:vearámuss BUOREMUS ;
veasttamuš+A+Superl:veasttamužž BUOREMUSS ;
vuolimuš+A+Superl:vuolimužž BUOREMUSS ;
vuosttamuš+A+Superl:vuosttamužž BUOREMUSS ;
váralaččamuš+A+Superl:váralaččamušš BUOREMUSS ;
áigeguovdil+A+Superl+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččamuss BUOREMUS ;
dihtolágaš:dihto# LAGAS ;
gehppeslágaš:gehppes# LAGAS ;
iešguhtetlágaš:ieš#guhtet9# LAGAS ;
monopollágaš:monopol# LAGAS ;
rukseslágaš:rukses# LAGAS ;
stuoralágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuora# LAGAS; !
sirotlágaš:sirot# LAGAS ;
jiešguhtetlágan:jieš#guhtet9# LAGAN ;
jiežamelágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežame# LAGAN ;
jiežanlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežan# LAGAS ;
jiežadetlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežadet# LAGAS ;
